Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-2305
Home visitation program funds; use.

Home visitation program funds may be used for workforce purposes and to assist the programs and individuals in receiving and maintaining certification for home visitation providers.

Laws 2025, LB22, § 5.